District of Columbia statutes.
20-505

Time of accrual of duties and powers.

The duties and powers of a personal representative commence upon the issuance of the letters. Good faith acts beneficial to the estate which in fact were committed by the personal representative prior to issuance of letters shall have the same effect as acts occurring after the issuance of letters. A personal representative may ratify acts done on behalf of the estate by others if the personal representative is authorized to perform such acts.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(y), 42 DCR 63

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-505.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-501.